Maine, session 132, LD490.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA c. 375, sub-c. 2-B is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 2-B
AUTOMATIC REPEAL OF RULES AND AMENDMENTS TO RULES
ADOPTED AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026
§8091. Automatic repeal of rules and amendments to rules adopted after January 1,
2026
The provisions of this section apply to any rule that is adopted or amended by any
agency in accordance with the requirements of this chapter after January 1, 2026, including
any rule that is adopted or amended prior to January 1, 2026 and then further amended after
January 1, 2026.
1. Automatic repeal. Except as provided in subsection 3 and notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, an agency rule that is finally adopted or an amendment to
which is finally adopted in accordance with the requirements of this chapter after January
1, 2026 is automatically repealed 5 years from the date of final adoption.
2. Notice of repeal. For a rule subject to automatic repeal under this section, including
any such rule renewed prior to repeal pursuant to subsection 3, the Secretary of State shall
provide to the agency that adopted or has jurisdiction over the rule a notice regarding the
date of the automatic repeal no later than 18 months prior to the date on which the rule is
repealed.
3. Renewal of rule prior to repeal. In accordance with this subsection, an agency
that has adopted or has jurisdiction over a rule subject to automatic repeal under this section
may submit to the Legislature a request that the rule be renewed and not be subject to repeal
for an additional period of up to 5 years.
A. The request must describe the basis for renewing the rule and include a cost-benefit
analysis of the rule. The agency must submit the request not earlier than 2 years and
not later than one year prior to the date on which the rule is automatically repealed in
accordance with this section and must publish the request on its publicly accessible
website at the time the request is submitted.
B. A request determined by the Legislature to be properly submitted under this
subsection must be reviewed by the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over the subject matter of the rule during the legislative session to which
the request is submitted or during the next legislative session if the request is submitted
while the Legislature is not in session. Following its review, the committee shall
submit to the Legislature any findings and recommendations regarding the request for
renewal and may report out legislation necessary to renew the rule for an additional
period of up to 5 years.
4. Legislative authority. Nothing in this section prohibits the enactment of legislation
that provides for the automatic repeal of an agency rule less than 5 years from the date on
which the rule or an amendment to the rule is finally adopted or for the repeal of an agency
Page 1 - 132LR1225(01)

411 rule prior to the date on which the rule is automatically repealed in accordance with this
422 section.